Alabama, session 2026rs, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
13 Section 1. This chapter may be cited as the Alabama
14 Charter School Finance Authority Act.
15 Section 2. It is the intent of the Legislature by
16 passage of this chapter to enable the state, acting by and
17 through the authority, to aid state charter educational
18 institutions in the financing and refinancing of project costs
19 on a tax-exempt basis. To this end, the Legislature intends to
20 authorize the authority to issue bonds for the purpose of
21 providing funds to enable the authority to make loans to state
22 charter educational institutions to pay project costs; and to
23 provide that state charter educational institutions shall
24 secure the payment of such loans out of a dedicated source of
25 revenue. This article shall be liberally construed in
26 conformity with the intentions of the Legislature expressed
27 above.
28 Section 3. As used in this chapter, the following terms
Page 1

Section 3. As used in this chapter, the following terms
SB62 Enrolled
29 have the following meanings:
30 (1) AUTHORITY. The Alabama Charter School Finance
31 Authority created by this chapter and any successor or
32 successors thereto. Any change in name or composition of the
33 authority shall in no way affect the vested rights of any
34 person under the provisions of this chapter.
35 (2) BOARD OF DIRECTORS. The board of directors of the
36 authority.
37 (3) BONDS. The bonds of the authority issued under the
38 provisions of this chapter, including revenue refunding bonds.
39 (4) COSTS. As applied to a project or any portion
40 thereof financed under the provisions of this chapter, all or
41 any part of the cost of construction, acquisition, alteration,
42 enlargement, reconstruction, and remodeling of a project
43 including all lands, structures, real or personal property,
44 rights-of-way, franchises, easements, permits, approvals,
45 licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits,
46 approvals, licenses, and certificates, and interests acquired
47 or used for or in connection with a project, the cost of
48 demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so
49 acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which
50 such buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all
51 machinery and equipment, financing charges, underwriters'
52 commissions or discounts, interest prior to, during, and for a
53 period of six months following estimated completion of such
54 construction and acquisition, provisions for reserves for
55 principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements,
56 additions, and improvements, the cost of architectural,
Page 2

additions, and improvements, the cost of architectural,
SB62 Enrolled
57 engineering, financing and legal services, plans,
58 specifications, studies, surveys, estimates of cost and
59 revenues, administrative expenses, expenses necessary or
60 incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of
61 constructing the project, and such other expenses as may be
62 necessary or incident to the construction and acquisition of
63 the project, the financing of such construction and
64 acquisition and placing of the project in operation. All funds
65 paid or advanced for any of the purposes aforesaid by any
66 institution prior to the issuance of any of the authority's
67 revenue bonds may be refunded to such institution out of the
68 proceeds of any revenue bonds so issued. Any obligation or
69 expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be
70 regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid
71 or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or
72 notes issued under the provisions of this chapter for such
73 project.
74 (5) FINANCING LOAN. A loan by the authority to a state
75 charter educational institution pursuant to the terms of this
76 chapter for the purpose of financing project costs incurred or
77 to be incurred by such state charter educational institution.
78 (6) PROJECT. A structure or structures available for
79 use as a dormitory or other student housing facility, a dining
80 hall, student union, administration building, academic
81 building, library, laboratory, research facility, classroom,
82 athletics facility, health care facility, maintenance, storage
83 or utility facility, and other structures or facilities
84 related thereto or required or useful for the instruction of
Page 3

related thereto or required or useful for the instruction of
SB62 Enrolled
85 students or the conducting of research or the operation of an
86 institution, whether proposed, under construction or
87 completed, including parking and other facilities or
88 structures essential or convenient for the orderly conduct of
89 such institution, and shall also include landscaping, site
90 preparation, furniture, equipment, and machinery and other
91 similar items necessary or convenient for the operation of a
92 particular facility or structure in the manner for which its
93 use is intended, but shall not include any items the costs of
94 which are customarily deemed to result in a current operating
95 change.
96 (7) STATE. The State of Alabama.
97 (8) STATE CHARTER EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION. Every public
98 state charter school according to state laws, heretofore or
99 hereafter established or acquired under statutory
100 authorization of the Legislature of Alabama and existing as a
101 public institution of learning supported in substantial part
102 by state appropriations, or by revenues derived from the
103 institution.
104 Section 4. There is hereby created a public body
105 corporate and politic to be known as the Alabama State Charter
106 School Finance Authority. Said authority shall not be a state
107 institution nor a department or agency of the state but shall
108 be a public instrumentality performing an essential
109 governmental function, being a distinct corporate entity. The
110 Governor or his or her designee shall be the president of the
111 authority, the Chair of the House Ways and Means Education
112 Committee shall be the vice president thereof, the State
Page 4

Committee shall be the vice president thereof, the State
SB62 Enrolled
113 Superintendent of Education shall be the secretary thereof,
114 the Chair of the Senate Finance and Taxation Education, the
115 State Finance Director, and the Executive Director of the
116 State Charter School Commission shall be members thereof. The
117 State Treasurer or any bank having trust powers or any trust
118 company shall be treasurer thereof, shall act as custodian of
119 its funds, and shall pay the principal of and interest on the
120 bonds of the authority out of the funds hereinafter provided
121 for. The members of the authority shall constitute all the
122 members of the board of directors of the authority, and any
123 three members of the said board of directors shall constitute
124 a quorum for the transaction of business. Should any person
125 holding any state office named in this section cease to hold
126 such office by reasons of death, resignation, expiration of
127 his or her term of office, or for any other reason, then his
128 or her successor in office shall take his or her place as a
129 member, officer, or director, as the case may be, of the
130 authority. No member, officer, or director of the authority
131 shall draw any salary in addition to that now authorized by
132 law for any service he or she may render or for any duty he or
133 she may perform in connection with the authority. All
134 proceedings had and done by the board of directors shall be
135 reduced to writing by the secretary of the authority, shall be
136 signed by at least two members of the authority, and shall be
137 recorded in a substantially bound book and filed in the office
138 of the secretary. Copies of such proceedings, when certified
139 by the secretary of the authority, under the seal of the
140 authority, shall be received in all courts as prima facie
Page 5

authority, shall be received in all courts as prima facie
SB62 Enrolled
141 evidence of the matters and things therein certified. The
142 members, officers, executive director, employees, and
143 representatives of the authority shall be immune from suit and
144 liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for
145 any claim or damage to or loss of property or personal injury
146 or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any
147 actual or alleged act, error, or emission that occurred, or
148 that the individual against whom the claim is made had a
149 reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
150 board employment, duties, or responsibilities. Nothing in this
151 subsection shall be construed to protect any individual from
152 suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
153 caused by the intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct of
154 that individual. The procurement of insurance of any type by
155 the board does not in any way compromise or limit the immunity
156 granted by this subsection.
157 Section 5. The authority shall have the following
158 powers:
159 (1) To adopt an official seal and alter the same at its
160 pleasure.
161 (2) To sue and be sued in contract and in tort and to
162 complain and defend in all courts of law and equity.
163 (3) To maintain an office at such a place or places as
164 it may designate.
165 (4) To borrow money and to issue bonds for the purpose
166 of making loans to state charter educational institutions to
167 finance project costs, and to provide for the rights of the
168 purchasers, holders, or owners of such bonds.
Page 6

purchasers, holders, or owners of such bonds.
SB62 Enrolled
169 (5) To make financing loans to any state charter
170 educational institution in order to finance project costs,
171 which financing loans may be evidenced or secured by loan
172 agreements, mortgage pledges, promissory notes, security
173 agreements, trust indentures, or such other instruments, and
174 upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of
175 the authority shall determine to be reasonable.
176 (6) To arrange for various forms of security or credit
177 enhancement for its bonds, including letters of credit,
178 guaranties, policies of insurance, and the like.
179 (7) As security for the payment of the principal of and
180 interest on any financing loan made to a state charter
181 educational institution, to take a pledge of and security
182 interest in:
183 a. State monies;
184 b. Federal monies;
185 c. Local funds;
186 d. Mortgage pledge of facilities; or
187 e. Any other monies or revenues received by such state
188 charter educational institution.
189 (8) As security for the payment of the principal of and
190 interest on its bonds, to pledge the revenues, receipts,
191 funds, and other property out of which the financing loans
192 made with the proceeds of its bonds are payable and to pledge,
193 transfer, and assign any repayment obligations of financing
194 loan recipients.
195 (9) As security for the payment of the principal of and
196 interest on any financing loan made to a state charter school
Page 7

interest on any financing loan made to a state charter school
SB62 Enrolled
197 educational institution, the authority may provide for any
198 legally permitted intercept programs that would allow the
199 authority to intercept charter school revenues eligible to
200 make debt service payments on authority bonds prior to
201 operating funds.
202 (10) To collect such fees and charges in connection
203 with its financing loans and bonds including, but not limited
204 to, reimbursement of administrative costs, as the authority
205 shall determine to be reasonable.
206 (11) To make and execute contracts for the servicing of
207 financing loans made by the authority and to pay the
208 reasonable value of services rendered to the authority
209 pursuant to such contracts.
210 (12) To invest proceeds of the bonds of the authority
211 not required for immediate use in such manner as the board of
212 directors shall determine.
213 (13) To establish accounts in one or more depositories.
214 (14) To make, enter into, and execute such financing
215 agreements, loan agreements, contracts, or other instruments
216 and to take such other actions as may be necessary or
217 convenient to accomplish any purpose for which the authority
218 was organized or to exercise any power granted to it.
219 (15) To charge to and apportion among participating
220 state charter educational institutions the administrative
221 costs and expenses incurred by the authority in the exercise
222 of the powers and duties conferred upon it by this chapter.
223 (16) To pledge or mortgage all or any portion of any
224 project costs conveyed to the authority for such purpose,
Page 8

project costs conveyed to the authority for such purpose,
SB62 Enrolled
225 whether presently owned or subsequently acquired, for the
226 benefit of the holders of the bonds of the authority issued to
227 finance such project costs or any portion thereof or issued to
228 refund or refinance outstanding indebtedness of a state
229 charter educational institution permitted by this chapter.
230 (17) To issue bonds for the purpose of refunding or
231 refinancing outstanding bonds issued pursuant to this chapter
232 or outstanding obligations incurred by state charter
233 educational institutions for the purpose of financing or
234 refinancing project costs, whether or not such bonds or other
235 obligations are outstanding prior to or after the effective
236 date of this act, provided that such indebtedness was
237 originally incurred for the purpose of project costs as
238 defined in this chapter.
239 (18) To exercise any power granted by the laws of the
240 state to public institutions which is not in conflict with the
241 purpose of this article.
242 (19) To adopt administrative regulations necessary or
243 appropriate to effectuate its purpose and to administer the
244 program authorized herein.
245 Section 6. (a) The authority is authorized and
246 empowered to issue its bonds from time to time for the purpose
247 of making financing loans to finance project costs incurred or
248 to be incurred by state charter educational institutions. Such
249 bonds may be in such an aggregate principal amount as the
250 board of directors shall determine to be necessary to pay the
251 project costs included in such financing. The authority may
252 pay from the proceeds of the sale of its bonds all expenses,
Page 9

pay from the proceeds of the sale of its bonds all expenses,
SB62 Enrolled
253 including publication and printing charges, attorney fees,
254 financial advisory fees, and other expenses which the board of
255 directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection
256 with the authorization, advertisement, sale, execution, and
257 issuance of its bonds or the making of financing loans from
258 the proceeds thereof.
259 (b) All bonds issued by the authority shall be limited
260 obligations of the authority payable solely from any
261 combination of the following:
262 (1) The revenues, receipts, funds, and other property
263 of the authority derived from the repayment of financing loans
264 made with proceeds of such bonds.
265 (2) Amounts derived from any letter of credit,
266 insurance policy, or any other form of credit enhancement
267 applicable to the bonds or financing loans made from the
268 proceeds thereof.
269 (3) Any reserve fund, debt service fund, or other fund
270 established for the purpose of making or providing for the
271 payment of debt service on such bonds.
272 (4) Any earnings on the proceeds of bonds invested by
273 the authority pending their disbursement.
274 Bonds shall not be general obligations of the
275 authority, shall not be payable from any state appropriations,
276 and shall not create a debt or obligation of the state.
277 (c) The principal of, premium, if any, and interest on
278 any bonds issued by the authority shall be secured by a pledge
279 of the revenues, receipts, funds, and other property out of
280 which the same may be payable and may be secured by a trust
Page 10

which the same may be payable and may be secured by a trust
SB62 Enrolled
281 indenture conveying as security for such bonds all or any part
282 of the property of the authority from which the revenues or
283 receipts so pledged may be so derived.
284 (1) The resolution of the board of directors under
285 which any bonds are authorized to be issued and any trust
286 indenture relating thereto may contain any agreements and
287 provisions respecting the collection and disposition of the
288 revenues and receipts subject to such trust indenture, the
289 creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues
290 and receipts, the rights, duties, and remedies of the parties
291 to any such instrument and the parties for the benefit of whom
292 such instrument is made and the rights and remedies available
293 in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall
294 deem advisable. Any pledge made with respect to bonds shall be
295 valid and binding from the time such pledge is made; the
296 revenues, receipts, funds, and other properties so pledged
297 shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge
298 without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the
299 lien of such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
300 parties having claims of any kind against the authority
301 irrespective of whether any such parties have notice thereof.
302 Neither the resolution of the board of directors authorizing
303 the bonds nor any other instrument by which such a pledge is
304 created need be recorded. Each pledge, agreement, or trust
305 indenture made for the benefit or security of any holders of
306 the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the
307 principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of
308 which the same were made shall have been fully paid.
Page 11

which the same were made shall have been fully paid.
SB62 Enrolled
309 (2) In the event of default in such payment or in any
310 agreements of the authority made as a part of the contract
311 under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the
312 proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any trust indenture
313 executed as security therefore, such default may be enforced
314 by writ of mandamus or any other available remedy under state
315 law.
316 (d) All bonds issued by the authority shall be signed
317 by the president or the vice president of the authority and
318 attested by its secretary, and the seal of the authority shall
319 be affixed thereto and attested to by the secretary. The
320 signatures of the president and the secretary may be facsimile
321 signatures, and a facsimile of the seal of the authority may
322 be imprinted on bonds if the board of directors provides for
323 the manual authentication of bonds by a trustee or paying
324 agent. Delivery of any bonds so executed shall be valid
325 notwithstanding any change in the officers of the authority or
326 in the seal of the authority after its delivery.
327 (e) Bonds may be executed and delivered by the
328 authority at any time and from time to time, shall be in such
329 form and denominations and of such tenor and maturities, shall
330 contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions
331 of this article, and shall bear such rate or rates of
332 interest, payable and evidenced in such manner, or may bear no
333 interest, as may be provided by resolution of the board of
334 directors. Bonds of the authority may be sold at either public
335 or private sale in such manner and at such price or prices and
336 at such time or times as may be determined by the board of
Page 12

at such time or times as may be determined by the board of
SB62 Enrolled
337 directors to be most advantageous. The authority may pay all
338 fees, expenses, premiums, and commissions incurred in
339 connection with the issuance of any of its bonds. All bonds
340 shall be construed to be negotiable instruments although
341 payable solely from a specified source. The board of directors
342 may provide, in its discretion, that such bonds shall bear
343 interest at a rate or rates fixed at the time of the issuance
344 thereof, or at fixed rates which may be changed from time to
345 time during the term of such bonds in accordance with an
346 objective procedure determined by such board of directors at
347 the time of the issuance of such bonds, or at a floating rate
348 or rates which may change from time to time in connection with
349 published interest rates or indexes that reflect an objective
350 response to market changes and interest rates by banks,
351 governmental agencies, or other generally recognized public or
352 private sources of information concerning interest rates. The
353 board of directors may also provide, in its discretion, that
354 interest on such bonds may be payable in cash at fixed
355 intervals, or through one or more payments which reflect
356 compound interest computed at specified intervals on accrued
357 but unpaid interest, or through a discount in the sales price
358 for such bonds equivalent to compound interest on such bonds
359 for all or part of the term thereof, or through any
360 combination of the foregoing methods of providing for the
361 payment of interest.
362 Section 7. (a) After making adequate provision for the
363 payment of the expenses of issuance, the authority is
364 authorized and empowered to use the proceeds of any bonds,
Page 13

authorized and empowered to use the proceeds of any bonds,
SB62 Enrolled
365 together with any other available funds: (i) to finance
366 project costs through financing loans to state charter
367 educational institutions, as herein authorized; (ii) to fund
368 such reserves as the authority deems necessary and desirable;
369 and (iii) to the extent not needed for the foregoing uses, to
370 pay or redeem such bonds.
371 (b) Pending the application of the proceeds of bonds to
372 the purpose or purposes of which such bonds were issued, such
373 proceeds may be invested by the authority in such manner,
374 consistent with the resolution pursuant to which such bonds
375 are issued, as the board of directors may deem advisable.
376 (c) Any and all revenues, receipts, investment
377 earnings, and other funds paid to, or otherwise coming into
378 the possession of, the authority as the result of financing
379 accomplished from the proceeds of bonds, shall be held,
380 deposited, administered, invested, and applied as provided in
381 the resolution of the board of directors authorizing the
382 issuance of such bonds and as provided in any trust indenture,
383 or other agreement delivered in connection therewith, or
384 otherwise as the authority may direct, consistent with the
385 provisions of such resolution, trust indenture, or other
386 agreement.
387 Section 8. (a) In order to provide for the funding of a
388 financing loan by the authority to a state charter educational
389 institution, such state charter educational institution shall
390 establish a dedicated source of revenue to secure the
391 repayment of monies received from the authority.
392 (b) Such state charter educational institution is
Page 14

(b) Such state charter educational institution is
SB62 Enrolled
393 hereby authorized and empowered, any existing statute to the
394 contrary notwithstanding, to do and perform any one or more of
395 the following:
396 (1) To obligate itself to pay to the authority at
397 periodic intervals a sum sufficient to provide for the payment
398 of debt service with respect to the bonds of the authority
399 issued to fund the financing loan made to such state charter
400 educational institution and to pay over such debt service to
401 the authority for the account of such state charter
402 educational institution.
403 (2) To levy, collect, and pay over to the authority and
404 to oblige itself to continue to levy, collect, and pay over to
405 the authority the proceeds of any revenue dedicated for the
406 purposes provided herein including, but not limited to:
407 a. State monies;
408 b. Federal monies;
409 c. Local funds;
410 d. Mortgage pledge; and
411 e. Any other monies or revenues received by such state
412 charter educational institution.
413 (3) To pledge as security for the payment of its
414 contractual obligation to the authority hereunder the proceeds
415 of any one or more of the sources specified in subdivision
416 (2).
417 (4) To obligate itself to continue to levy and collect
418 such revenues, fees, charges, and taxes as shall equal not
419 less than 110 percent nor more than 125 percent, as determined
420 by the authority of the maximum principal and interest
Page 15

by the authority of the maximum principal and interest
SB62 Enrolled
421 maturing and coming due in any one year on the bonds issued by
422 the authority to fund the financing loan to such state charter
423 educational institution.
424 (5) To enter into such agreements, to perform such
425 acts, and to delegate such functions and duties as its
426 governing body shall determine to be necessary or desirable to
427 enable the authority to fund a financing loan to such state
428 charter educational institution.
429 Section 9. Any bonds issued by the authority may from
430 time to time be refunded by the issuance, by sale or exchange
431 of refunding bonds or obligations payable from the same or
432 different sources for the purpose of paying all or any part of
433 the principal of the bonds to be refunded, any redemption
434 premium required to be paid as a condition to the redemption
435 prior to maturity of any such bonds that are to be so redeemed
436 in connection with such refunding, any accrued and unpaid
437 interest on the bonds to be refunded, any interest to accrue
438 on each revenue bond to be refunded to the date on which it is
439 to be paid, whether at maturity or by redemption prior to
440 maturity, and the expenses incurred in connection with the
441 refunding; provided, that unless duly called for redemption
442 pursuant to provisions contained therein, the holders of any
443 such bonds then outstanding and proposed to be refunded shall
444 not be compelled without their consent to surrender their
445 outstanding bonds for such refunding. Any refunded bonds or
446 obligations may be sold by the authority at public or private
447 sale at such price or prices as may be determined by the board
448 of directors to be most advantageous or may be exchanged for
Page 16

of directors to be most advantageous or may be exchanged for
SB62 Enrolled
449 the bonds to be refunded. Any such refunding bonds or
450 obligations may be executed and delivered by the authority at
451 any time and from time to time, shall be in such form and
452 denominations and have such tenor and maturities, shall
453 contain such provisions not inconsistent with the provisions
454 of this article, and shall bear such rate or rates of
455 interest, payable and evidenced in such manner, as may be
456 provided by resolution of the board of directors. Any
457 refunding bonds or obligations issued by the authority shall
458 be issued and secured in accordance with the provisions of
459 Section 6.
460 Section 10. The State Treasurer may invest any idle or
461 surplus money of the state in bonds of the authority. The
462 governing body of any county or municipality is authorized in
463 its discretion to invest any idle or surplus money held in its
464 treasury in bonds of the authority. Such bonds shall be legal
465 investments for executors, administrators, trustees, and other
466 fiduciaries, unless otherwise directed by the court having
467 jurisdiction of the fiduciary relation or by the document that
468 is the source of the fiduciary's authority, and for savings
469 banks and insurance companies organized under the laws of the
470 state.
471 Section 11. The property and income of the authority,
472 all bonds issued by the authority, the income from such bonds
473 or from any other sources, the interest and other profits from
474 such bonds ensuring to and received by the holders thereof,
475 conveyances by and to the authority and leases, mortgages, and
476 deeds of trust by and to the authority shall be exempt from
Page 17

deeds of trust by and to the authority shall be exempt from
SB62 Enrolled
477 all taxation in the State of Alabama. The authority shall not
478 be obligated to pay or allow the payment of any fees, taxes,
479 or costs to the Secretary of State or to any judge of probate
480 of any county in connection with the recording by it of any
481 document or otherwise, the authority being hereby exempted
482 from the payment of any such fees, taxes, and costs. No
483 license or excise tax may be imposed by any authority with
484 respect to the privilege of engaging in any of the activities
485 in this chapter.
486 Section 12. The authority's legal situs or residence
487 for the purpose of this chapter shall be Montgomery County.
488 Any action to protect or enforce any rights under the
489 provisions of this chapter shall be brought in the circuit
490 court of Montgomery County, Alabama, and said court shall have
491 exclusive original jurisdiction of all such actions.
492 Section 13. While any of the bonds issued by the
493 authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence
494 of the authority or of any of its officers shall not be
495 diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect
496 adversely the interest and rights of the holders of such
497 bonds. The provisions of this chapter shall be for the benefit
498 of the state, the authority, and the holders of any such
499 bonds, and, upon the issuance of the bonds as herein provided,
500 such provisions shall constitute a contract with the holders
501 of such bonds. The provisions of any bond resolution,
502 indenture, or trust agreement shall be a contract with every
503 holder of such bonds, and the duties of the authority under
504 any such bond resolution, indenture, or trust agreement shall
Page 18

any such bond resolution, indenture, or trust agreement shall
SB62 Enrolled
505 be enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus or other
506 appropriate suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity.
507 Section 14. All monies received by the authority
508 pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to be trust funds for
509 the holders of the bonds and shall be held and applied for the
510 benefit of the bondholders of the respective issues as
511 provided in this chapter and as provided in the authorizing
512 resolutions of the authority.
513 Section 15. The provisions of this act are severable.
514 If any part of this act is declared invalid or
515 unconstitutional, such a declaration shall not affect the part
516 which remains.
517 Section 16. All laws or parts of laws which conflict
518 with this act are repealed.
519 Section 17. This act shall become effective on October
520 1, 2026.
Page 19

1, 2026.
SB62 Enrolled
521
522
523
524
525
526
527 ________________________________________________
528 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
529
530
531
532 ________________________________________________
533 Speaker of the House of Representatives
534
535
536 SB62
537 Senate 05-Feb-26
538 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
539 the Senate, as amended.
540
541 Patrick Harris,
542 Secretary.
543
544
545
546
547 House of Representatives
548 Passed: 08-Apr-26
549
550
551
552
553 By: Senator Orr
Page 20